Utah statutes.
76-8-603.   Wrongful attachment by justice court judge -- Liability.

It is unlawful for any justice court judge to issue any writ of attachment, and for any party, agent, or attorney of the party, to advise, induce, or procure the issuance thereof, in any action, suit, or proceeding before the affidavit  is filed, or where the affidavit filed does not conform substantially with the requirements of Rule 64C of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.  Any person violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and shall be liable to the person whose property, credits, money, or earnings are attached for double the value of the attached property, together with all costs paid by him, and all damages incurred in the attachment proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 59, 1990 General Session

